Washington statutes.
RCW 35.89.070

Payment of interest on bonds.

The treasurer of such city or town shall pay the interest on the water redemption bonds authorized by this chapter out of the money in the water redemption fund.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.89.070. Prior: 1923 c 52 s 6; RRS s 9154-6.]